Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
EMPLOYER INCENTIVE FUND
SECTION 1.
(1) The Employer Incentive Fund is established in the State  Treasury, sep-
arate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Employer Incentive Fund
shall be credited to  the fund, but interest earned may not be used under section 2 of this 2018
Act to match lump sum payments made under ORS 238.229.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board for the purposes described in sections 2 and 26 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 2.  (1)(a) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall establish a process for
distributing the  moneys in the Employer Incentive Fund established under section 1 of this
2018 Act.
(b) The process must allow a participating public employer to  apply to reserve matching
amounts in the Employer Incentive Fund by committing to make a qualifying lump sum
payment of at least $25,000 to an account established under ORS 238.229.
(2) The board shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) The percentage of a  lump sum payment that may be matched by distributions from
the fund, not to exceed 25 percent of a qualifying lump sum payment.
(b) The maximum matching amount  that may be reserved by a participating public em-
ployer, not to exceed the greater of:
(A) Five  percent of the unfunded actuarial liability attributable to the employer, as de-
termined in the most recent report prepared under ORS 238.605; or
(B) $300,000.
(c) The qualifications for lump sum payments that may be matched under  this section.
The qualifications must include the following requirements:
(A) The participating public employer must apply to reserve matching funds no later than
December 31, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-B) Page 1
(B) The participating public employer must  make the qualifying lump sum payment no
later than July 1, 2023.
(C) A  qualifying lump sum payment may not be a payment from moneys borrowed by the
employer.
(d) A requirement that  the participating public employer participate in the Unfunded
Actuarial Liability Resolution Program to develop a plan under section 26 of this 2018 Act.
(3)(a) The board may begin accepting applications under subsection (1) of this section  on
the date on which the board determines that  there are sufficient moneys in the Employer
Incentive Fund.
(b) For 180 days after the board begins accepting applications under subsection  (1) of this
section, a participating  public employer may apply to reserve matching amounts from the
Employer Incentive Fund under subsection (1)  of this section only if the unfunded actuarial
liability attributable to the employer, as determined in the  most recent report prepared un-
der ORS 238.605, is  more than 200 percent of the employer’s payroll for members of the
Public Employees Retirement System.
(c) After the 180-day period described  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any partic-
ipating public employer may apply to reserve matching funds from the Employer Incentive
Fund under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The  board shall approve applications that meet the qualifications established under
subsection (2) of this section in the order in which the applications are submitted. The board
shall continue approving applications as long as moneys in the  Employer Incentive Fund are
available.
(5) The board shall transfer matching amounts approved under subsection (4)  of this
section from the Employer Incentive Fund to the approved employers’ accounts established
under ORS 238.229.
(6) The  board may transfer moneys from the Employer Incentive Fund to the Public
Employees Retirement Fund established under ORS 238.660 for crediting  to the reserves for
pension accounts and annuities as provided in ORS 238.670 (2).
(7) The board may use moneys in the Employer  Incentive Fund for reasonable adminis-
trative costs incurred under this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2018 Act is repealed January 2, 2025.
(2)(a) The Employer Incentive Fund established under section 1 of this 2018 Act is  abol-
ished on January 2, 2025.
(b) The unexpended moneys remaining in the Employer Incentive Fund on  January 2,
2025, shall be transferred to the General Fund.
AMORTIZATION PERIOD FOR LUMP SUM PAYMENTS
SECTION 3a. Section 3b of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 238.
SECTION 3b. If a participating public employer makes a lump sum payment from moneys
not borrowed by the employer  to an account established under ORS 238.229 in an amount
equal to or greater than $10 million, the Public Employees Retirement Board shall allow  the
participating public employer to choose an amortization period of six  years, 10 years, 16
years or 20 years  for the use of the lump sum payment to offset contributions to the system
that the public employer would otherwise be required to make  for the liabilities against
which the lump sum payment is applied.
NOTE: Sections 4 through 11 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections  were not re-
numbered.
PROCEEDS FROM DEBT COLLECTION
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-B) Page 2
SECTION 12. (1) Not later than January  31 of each year, the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services shall calculate:
(a) The average amount per fiscal  year collected by or on behalf of state agencies re-
quired to report under ORS 293.229 for liquidated  and delinquent accounts owed to the Gen-
eral Fund during the three fiscal years preceding the immediately preceding fiscal year; and
(b) The amount collected by or on behalf of state agencies required to  report under ORS
293.229 for liquidated and  delinquent accounts owed to the General Fund during the imme-
diately preceding fiscal year, as reported under ORS 293.229.
(2) If the amount calculated under subsection  (1)(b) of this section exceeds the average
calculated under subsection (1)(a)  of this section, the department shall coordinate the
transfer from the General Fund of an amount equal  to the excess, less any amount required
to be returned to taxpayers under ORS 291.349, to the School Districts Unfunded  Liability
Fund established in section 24 of this 2018 Act. The department shall coordinate the transfer
of amounts required under this section at least once in each biennium.
SECTION 12a. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall make the
first calculation under section  12 (1)(a) of this 2018 Act no later than January 31, 2019, for
the three fiscal years beginning July 1, 2014.
(2) Notwithstanding section 12 (2) of this 2018 Act, the  department shall coordinate the
first transfer of amounts required under section 12 (2) of this  2018 Act no later than January
31, 2020.
SECTION 12b. Section 12 of this 2018 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
PROCEEDS FROM CAPITAL GAINS TAX
SECTION 13. (1) Not earlier  than July 1 and not later than October 1 of the years 2019,
2021 and 2023, the division of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  that serves
as office of economic analysis shall:
(a) Calculate the rate of change in  the tax liability from personal income taxes on taxable
capital gains during the five preceding biennia; and
(b) Use the rate of change calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection to  forecast
the tax liability from personal income taxes on taxable capital  gains for the biennium be-
ginning on July 1 of the year in which the calculation is made.
(2) Not later than November 1 of the odd-numbered year  following each calculation under
subsection (1)  of this section, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in consul-
tation with the Department of Revenue, shall estimate the tax liability  from personal income
taxes on taxable capital gains for the previous biennium.
(3) Not later than November 30 of the odd-numbered year in which the estimate is  made
under subsection  (2) of this section, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in
consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall determine whether the tax liability from
personal income taxes on capital gains estimated under subsection (2)  of this section, less
any amount required to be returned to taxpayers under ORS 291.349, exceeds the  tax liability
from personal income taxes on taxable capital gains forecasted  under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the Department  of Revenue shall
transfer an amount equal to 25 percent of any excess calculated under subsection (3)  of this
section to the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund established in section 24 of this  2018
Act.
(5) The Department of Revenue may not make  a transfer under subsection (4) of this
section if:
(a) The Legislative Assembly has appropriated moneys from the Oregon Rainy  Day Fund
under ORS 293.144 on or after the effective date of this 2018 Act; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-B) Page 3
(b) The Public Employees Retirement System is more than 90 percent funded as  deter-
mined in accordance with rules adopted by the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(6) The Department of Revenue shall retain  unreceipted revenue from the tax imposed
under ORS chapter  316 in an amount necessary to make the transfer required under sub-
section (4) of this section. The department shall make  the transfer out of the unreceipted
revenue in lieu of paying the revenue over to the State Treasurer for deposit  in the General
Fund.
SECTION 14. The division of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  that
serves as office  of economic analysis shall make the first calculation required under section
13 (1) of this 2018 Act not later than October  1, 2019. The calculation shall be for the five
biennia beginning July 1, 2009.
PROCEEDS FROM ESTATE TAXES
SECTION 15. (1) Not earlier than July 1 and not later than October 1  of the years 2019,
2021 and 2023, the division of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  that serves
as office of economic analysis shall:
(a) Calculate the rate of change in collections from  estate taxes during the five preceding
biennia; and
(b) Use  the rate of change calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection to forecast
the collections from estate taxes for the biennium beginning on July 1 of the  year in which
the calculation is made.
(2) Not later than November 1 of the odd-numbered year  following each calculation under
subsection (1) of this section, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in  consul-
tation with the Department of Revenue,  shall estimate the collections from estate taxes for
the previous biennium.
(3) Not later than November 30 of the odd-numbered year in which the estimate is  made
under subsection  (2) of this section, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in
consultation with the Department  of Revenue, shall determine whether the collections from
estate taxes estimated under subsection (2) of this section exceed the  collections from estate
taxes forecasted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The Department of  Revenue shall transfer an amount equal to the amount of any
excess calculated under subsection (3) of this section,  less any amount required to be re-
turned to taxpayers under ORS 291.349, to the School Districts Unfunded Liability  Fund es-
tablished in section 24 of this 2018 Act.
(5) The Department of  Revenue shall retain unreceipted revenue from estate taxes im-
posed under ORS 118.005 to 118.540 in an amount  necessary to make the transfer required
under subsection (4) of this section. The department shall make the  transfer out of the un-
receipted revenue in lieu of paying the revenue over  to the State Treasurer for deposit in the
General Fund.
SECTION 16. The division of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  that
serves as office  of economic analysis shall make the first calculation required under section
15 (1) of this 2018 Act not later than October  1, 2019. The calculation shall be for the five
biennia beginning January 1, 2009.
NOTE: Sections 17  through 21 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not re-
numbered.
INTEREST FROM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY
SECTION 22. (1) On January 1 of each year, the Department of State Lands shall transfer
from the Common School Fund Account to the School Districts Unfunded Liability  Fund es-
tablished in section 24 of this 2018 Act all or part of the interest earned in the previous cal-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-B) Page 4
endar year from the cumulative unclaimed property deposited in the  Common School Fund
Account under ORS 98.386 to which the state has not taken title, as described  in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The amount made available under subsection (1) of this section may  not exceed an
amount equal to the  proceeds from unclaimed property received by the department in the
previous calendar year, minus:
(a) The amount paid for unclaimed property claims  under ORS 98.396 in the previous
calendar year;
(b) The department’s investment expenses related to the Common  School Fund for the
previous calendar year; and
(c) Operating expenses that the department  is entitled to recover for the previous cal-
endar year.
SECTION 23. Section 22 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SCHOOL DISTRICTS UNFUNDED LIABILITY FUND
SECTION 24. (1) The School Districts  Unfunded Liability Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the School Dis-
tricts Unfunded Liability Fund shall  be credited to the fund. The fund consists of moneys
transferred to the  fund under sections 12, 13, 15 and 22 of this 2018 Act and other moneys
transferred, allocated or appropriated to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board for the purpose  of establishing and funding a pooled account to be applied
against the liabilities of participating  public employers, as defined in ORS 238.005, that are
school districts.
(3) The board  shall establish an account in the Public Employees Retirement Fund for
the moneys in the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund.
(4) The board shall adopt rules providing for:
(a) Proportional distribution to school districts of the moneys in the  account established
under subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Amortization of the moneys distributed; and
(c) Administration of the account established under subsection (3) of this section  in the
same manner as accounts established under ORS 238.229 (2).
(5) No later than February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the  board shall report to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services and  the Legislative Fiscal Officer an estimate
of how moneys will be distributed under this section in the following biennium.
UNFUNDED ACTUARIAL LIABILITY RESOLUTION PROGRAM
SECTION 25.
Section 26 of  this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 238.
SECTION 26. (1) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall establish an Unfunded
Actuarial Liability Resolution Program. Under the program, the board shall provide  techni-
cal expertise to participating public employers  in developing plans to improve the employers’
funded status and to manage projected employer contribution  rate changes. Participating
public employers are not required to participate in the program.
(2) The board may use moneys in the  Employer Incentive Fund established in section 1
of this 2018 Act for reasonable administrative costs incurred under this section.
REPORTING BY PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT BOARD
SECTION 27. Section 28 of  this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 238.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-B) Page 5
SECTION 28. During each regular session of the Legislative Assembly, the Public  Em-
ployees Retirement Board shall report to the Joint Committee on Ways  and Means on the
status of the Employer Incentive Fund established  in section 1 of this 2018 Act, the School
Districts Unfunded Liability Fund established in section 24 of this 2018 Act and  the Unfunded
Actuarial Liability Resolution Program established under section 26 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 29. Section 28 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
STUDY BY STATE TREASURER
SECTION 30. (1) The State Treasurer shall study the feasibility and prudence of borrow-
ing moneys currently deposited by state agencies and other state entities  into the Oregon
Short Term Fund created by ORS 293.728 to be redeployed by the Oregon  Investment Council
into investments in the Public Employees Retirement  Fund created in ORS 238.660, that
would generate a higher rate of return sufficient to repay  the borrowing and make supple-
mental deposits targeted at reducing the unfunded actuarial liability of the  Public Employees
Retirement System. The study must include  an examination of recent similar actions in
other states.
(2) The State Treasurer shall report to the Legislative Assembly in the manner  provided
in ORS 192.245 on the results of the study performed under subsection (1) of this section no
later than September 30, 2019.
REVIEW BY SUPREME COURT
SECTION 31. (1) Jurisdiction is conferred upon the Supreme Court to determine in the
manner provided by this section whether this 2018 Act violates any  provision of the Oregon
Constitution or of the United States Constitution.
(2) A person who is adversely affected by this 2018 Act or who will  be adversely affected
by this 2018 Act may  institute a proceeding for review by filing with the Supreme Court a
petition that meets the following requirements:
(a) The petition must be filed within 60 days after the effective date of this 2018 Act.
(b) The petition must include the following:
(A) A statement of the basis of the challenge; and
(B) A statement and supporting affidavit showing how  the petitioner is adversely af-
fected.
(3) The petitioner shall  serve a copy of the petition by registered or certified mail upon
the Public Employees Retirement Board, the Attorney General and the Governor.
(4) Proceedings for review under this section shall be given priority  over all other mat-
ters before the Supreme Court.
(5) The Supreme Court shall allow  public employers participating in the Public Employees
Retirement System to intervene in any proceeding under this section.
(6)(a) The  Supreme Court shall allow members of the Legislative Assembly to intervene
in any proceeding relating  to this 2018 Act. After a member intervenes in a proceeding re-
lating to this 2018 Act, the member has standing to participate in  the proceeding even if the
member ceases to be a member of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) A member of the Senate or the House  of Representatives who intervenes in or par-
ticipates in a proceeding under this subsection may not use public funds to pay legal ex-
penses incurred in intervening in or participating in the proceeding.
(7) In the  event the Supreme Court determines that there are factual issues in the peti-
tion, the Supreme Court may  appoint a special master to hear evidence and to prepare re-
commended findings of fact.
(8) The Supreme Court may not  award attorney fees to a petitioner in a proceeding under
this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-B) Page 6
RECONCILIATION WITH ENROLLED SENATE BILL 1529
SECTION 32.  Section 31, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2018 (Enrolled Senate Bill 1529), is
amended to read:
Sec. 31.  On or before July 1, 2021, the Department of Revenue shall:
(1) Estimate the increase, if any, of corporate tax  revenue received by the department and at-
tributable to the treatment of post-1986 deferred foreign  income under An Act to Provide for Re-
conciliation Pursuant to Titles II and V of the Concurrent Resolution on the Budget for Fiscal  Year
2018 (P.L. 115-97); and
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 317.853, distribute an amount equal to the estimate required under
subsection (1) of this section as follows:
(a) 18 percent shall  be transferred to the Employer Incentive Fund established under [ section 31a
of this 2018 Act ] section 1 of this 2018 Act .
(b) 82  percent shall be transferred to the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund established
under [ section 31b of this 2018 Act ] section 24 of this 2018 Act .
SECTION 33. Sections 31a and 31b, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2018  (Enrolled Senate Bill
1529), are repealed.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 34. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 35. This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-B) Page 7